Hawaii statutes.
§209-7 Closing of application date;
position of coordinator terminated. The governor shall set a date after
which no further applications for assistance under this chapter shall be
received and may thereafter for good cause extend the date for a reasonable
period of time. If no date is set by the governor, no application shall be
received six months after the issuance of the governor's proclamation declaring
a state disaster.

With respect to each state disaster declared by
the governor pursuant to section 209-2 the position of rehabilitation
coordinator shall be abolished upon completion of the rehabilitation
coordinator's duties provided for in this chapter as determined by the
governor. [L 1961, c 189, §8; Supp, §98P-8; HRS §209-7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next